Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
D. Miscellaneous

§ 17-16-1440.
Deposit with state treasurer.

Assets of a dissolved corporation that should be transferred to a creditor, claimant or shareholder of the corporation who cannot be found or who is not competent to receive them shall be reduced to cash and deposited with the state treasurer for safekeeping. When the creditor, claimant or shareholder furnishes satisfactory proof of entitlement to the amount deposited, the state treasurer shall pay him or his representative that amount.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1.